asdf/dicionarios/pt_pt.aff
SFX 30 Y 259
SFX 30   ir              o               uir             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   r               o               air             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   r               s               [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   ir              i               [ua]ir          +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   ir              ímos            [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   ir              ís              [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   ir              em              [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   ir              ía              [ua]ir          +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   ir              ías             [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   ir              íamos           [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   ir              íeis            [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   ir              íam             [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   ir              í               [ua]ir          +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   ir              íste            [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   r               u               [ua]ir          +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   ir              ímos            [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   ir              ístes           [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   ir              íram            [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   ir              íra             [ua]ir          +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   ir              íras            [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   ir              íramos          [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   ir              íreis           [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   ir              íram            [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   0               ei              [ua]ir          +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               ás              [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               á               [ua]ir          +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               emos            [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   0               eis             [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   0               ão              [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   ir              a               uir             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   ir              as              uir             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   ir              amos            uir             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   ir              ais             uir             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   ir              am              uir             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   r               a               air             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   r               as              air             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   r               amos            air             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   r               ais             air             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   r               am              air             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   ir              ísse            [ua]ir          +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX 30   ir              ísses           [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX 30   ir              íssemos         [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   ir              ísseis          [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   ir              íssem           [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   ir              íres            [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX 30   0               mos             [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   ir              írdes           [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   ir              írem            [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   0               ia              [ua]ir          +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 30   0               ias             [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 30   0               íamos           [ua]ir          +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   0               íeis            [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   0               iam             [ua]ir          +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   ir              i               [ua]ir          +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 30   r               a               air             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 30   ir              a               uir             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 30   r               amos            air             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   ir              amos            uir             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   ir              í               [ua]ir          +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   r               am              air             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   ir              am              uir             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   r               ndo             [ua]ir          +T=g
SFX 30   ir              ído             [^q][ua]ir      +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              ída             [^q][ua]ir      +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              ídos            [^q][ua]ir      +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              ídas            [^q][ua]ir      +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              ido             quir            +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              ida             quir            +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              idos            quir            +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   ir              idas            quir            +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   r               nho             por             +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   or              ões             por             +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   or              õe              por             +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   r               mos             por             +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   r               ndes            por             +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   or              õem             por             +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   or              unha            por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   or              unhas           por             +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   or              únhamos         por             +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   or              únheis          por             +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   or              unham           por             +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   or              us              por             +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   or              useste          por             +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   or              ôs              por             +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   or              usemos          por             +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   or              usestes         por             +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   or              useram          por             +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   or              usera           por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   or              useras          por             +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   or              uséramos        por             +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   or              uséreis         por             +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   or              useram          por             +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   0               ei              por             +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               ás              por             +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               á               por             +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   0               emos            por             +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   0               eis             por             +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   0               ão              por             +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   r               nha             por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   r               nhas            por             +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   r               nhamos          por             +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   r               nhais           por             +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   r               nham            por             +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   or              usesse          por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX 30   or              usesses         por             +P=2,N=s,T=pic
SFX 30   or              uséssemos       por             +P=1,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   or              usésseis        por             +P=2,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   or              usessem         por             +P=3,N=p,T=pic
SFX 30   or              user            por             +P=1,N=s,T=fc
SFX 30   or              useres          por             +P=2,N=s,T=fc
SFX 30   or              user            por             +P=3,N=s,T=fc
SFX 30   or              usermos         por             +P=1,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   or              userdes         por             +P=2,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   or              userem          por             +P=3,N=p,T=fc
SFX 30   0               ia              por             +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX 30   0               ias             por             +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX 30   0               íamos           por             +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   0               íeis            por             +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   0               iam             por             +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX 30   or              õe              por             +P=2,N=s,T=i
SFX 30   r               nha             por             +P=3,N=s,T=i
SFX 30   r               nhamos          por             +P=1,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   r               nde             por             +P=2,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   r               nham            por             +P=3,N=p,T=i
SFX 30   r               ndo             por             +T=g
SFX 30   r               sto             por             +G=m,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   r               sta             por             +G=f,N=s,T=ppa
SFX 30   r               stos            por             +G=m,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   r               stas            por             +G=f,N=p,T=ppa
SFX 30   0               es              por             +P=2,N=s,T=ip
SFX 30   0               mos             por             +P=1,N=p,T=ip
SFX 30   0               des             por             +P=2,N=p,T=ip
SFX 30   0               em              por             +P=3,N=p,T=ip
SFX 30   zer             ço              fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   r               s               fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   zer             z               fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=p
SFX 30   r               mos             fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   r               is              fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   r               m               fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=p
SFX 30   er              ia              fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   er              ias             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pi
SFX 30   er              íamos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   er              íeis            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   er              iam             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pi
SFX 30   azer            iz              fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            izeste          fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            ez              fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            izemos          fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            izestes         fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            izeram          fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pp
SFX 30   azer            izera           fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   azer            izeras          fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pmp
SFX 30   azer            izéramos        fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   azer            izéreis         fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   azer            izeram          fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pmp
SFX 30   zer             rei             fazer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   zer             rás             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   zer             rá              fazer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX 30   zer             remos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   zer             reis            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   zer             rão             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX 30   zer             ça              fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   zer             ças             fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pc
SFX 30   zer             çamos           fazer           +P=1,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   zer             çais            fazer           +P=2,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   zer             çam             fazer           +P=3,N=p,T=pc
SFX 30   azer            izesse          fazer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=pic
SFX 30   azer            izesses         fazer           +P=2,N=s,T=pic
